Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 3. Manufacturer and Distributor Practices.

Sec. 45.25.300.
Unfair practices.

A manufacturer may not

require, coerce, or attempt to coerce a new motor vehicle dealer to change the location of the new motor vehicle dealership or to make any substantial alterations to the new motor vehicle dealership premises or facilities if the alterations would be unreasonable or if there is not expected to be a sufficient supply of new motor vehicles to justify the change of location or the alterations because of market and economic conditions; this paragraph does not apply to alterations that are necessary to comply with health or safety laws; in this paragraph, “substantial alterations” does not include erecting signs subject to the manufacturer’s intellectual property rights, doing interior painting that is necessary to keep a new motor vehicle dealer facility in an attractive condition, or performing routine maintenance;

require a new motor vehicle dealer to purchase or include in inventory a predetermined number or percentage of certified pre-owned motor vehicles or lease return motor vehicles;

except because of reasons beyond the manufacturer’s control, refuse or fail to deliver or offer for sale in reasonable quantities to a new motor vehicle dealer holding a franchise for a line make of new motor vehicles sold or distributed by the manufacturer a new motor vehicle, part, or accessory, if the new motor vehicle, part, or accessory is being delivered to other new motor vehicle dealers; this paragraph does not apply to limited edition or limited release vehicle parts or accessories;

require a new motor vehicle dealer to purchase unreasonable advertising displays or other materials or an unreasonable number of signs;

require a new motor vehicle dealer to order or accept delivery of a new motor vehicle, part, accessory, piece of equipment, promotional material, display device, display decoration, or other item that is not otherwise required by law and that the new motor vehicle dealer does not voluntarily order; this paragraph does not apply to safety and emissions recall campaign parts or to a motor vehicle feature, part, accessory, or other component required by federal law, the law of this state, or local law;

coerce, attempt to coerce, or require a new motor vehicle dealer to

join, contribute money to, or affiliate with an advertising association; or

participate monetarily in an advertising campaign; or

increase the price of a new motor vehicle that the new motor vehicle dealer has ordered from the manufacturer and for which there exists at the time of the order a bona fide sale to a retail or fleet purchaser if the dealer submitted the order to the manufacturer before the manufacturer provided the new motor vehicle dealer with an official written price increase notification.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002; am § 13 ch 50 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 30, 2018, rewrote the section.

Sec. 45.25.310.
Discrimination.

A manufacturer may not unfairly discriminate among new motor vehicle dealers with respect to warranty reimbursements or authority granted new motor vehicle dealers to make warranty adjustments with retail customers.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002)

Sec. 45.25.320.
Time limits on claim audits, claim denials, claim reductions, and charge backs.

History.

[Repealed, § 16 ch 50 SLA 2018.]